Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma
Historical Society from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Fifteen Thousand Dollars
($15,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to fund the
Pawnee Bill Wild West Show.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11150 JL 01/13/25
Req. No. 11150 Page 1